Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 480.40, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section and section 480.45, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) deleted text begin "Judicial official"deleted text end new text begin "Covered official"new text end means: (1) every Minnesota district court judge, senior judge, retired judge, and every judge of the Minnesota Court of Appeals and every active, senior, recalled, or retired federal judge who resides in Minnesota; (2) a current or retired justice of the Minnesota Supreme Court; (3) employees of the Minnesota judicial branch; (4) judicial referees and magistrate judges; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) current and retired judges and current employees of the Office of Administrative Hearings, Department of Human Services Appeals Division, Workers' Compensation Court of Appeals, and Tax Courtnew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (6) a current or former member of the Minnesota legislaturenew text end . (c) "Personal information" does not include publicly available information. Personal information means: (1) a residential address of a deleted text begin judicialdeleted text end new text begin coverednew text end official; (2) a residential address of the spouse, domestic partner, or children of a deleted text begin judicialdeleted text end new text begin coverednew text end official; (3) a deleted text begin nonjudicial branch issueddeleted text end new text begin personalnew text end telephone number or email address of a deleted text begin judicialdeleted text end new text begin coverednew text end official; (4) the name of any child of a deleted text begin judicialdeleted text end new text begin coverednew text end official; and (5) the name of any child care facility or school that is attended by a child of a deleted text begin judicialdeleted text end new text begin coverednew text end official if combined with an assertion that the named facility or school is attended by the child of a deleted text begin judicialdeleted text end new text begin coverednew text end official. (d) "Publicly available information" means information that is lawfully made available through federal, state, or local government records or information that a business has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public through widely distributed media, by a deleted text begin judicialdeleted text end new text begin coverednew text end official, or by a person to whom the deleted text begin judicialdeleted text end new text begin coverednew text end official has disclosed the information, unless the deleted text begin judicialdeleted text end new text begin coverednew text end official has restricted the information to a specific audience. (e) "Law enforcement support organizations" do not include charitable organizations. (f) "Real property records" has the meaning given in section 480.50, subdivision 1, paragraph (f). Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 480.45, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Removal of personal information; exception. (a) Upon receipt of an affidavit requesting removal of the personal information of a deleted text begin judicialdeleted text end new text begin coverednew text end official that meets the requirements of subdivision 1, the person, business, association, or government entity shall remove the publicly posted personal information within 30 days. If the person, business, association, or government entity fails to remove the publicly posted personal information within 30 days after an affidavit is submitted, the deleted text begin judicialdeleted text end new text begin coverednew text end official may file a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction seeking a court order compelling compliance, including injunctive and declarative relief. (b) Paragraph (a) shall not apply to personal information contained in real property records, as defined in section 480.50, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), when disseminated directly by a government entity or when publicly posted or published in a manner required by statute. Sec. 3. new text begin LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL PRIVACY PROTECTIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Task force established. new text end new text begin A government official privacy protection task force is established within the legislative branch to analyze the need for expanded protection of the personal information and privacy of Minnesota government officials and explore options for efficiently and effectively administering such protections. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The government official privacy protection task force consists of 12 members, including: new text end new text begin (1) the eight members of the Legislative Commission on Data Practices and Personal Data Privacy; new text end new text begin (2) one person appointed by the secretary of state; new text end new text begin (3) one person appointed by the commissioner of administration; new text end new text begin (4) one person appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court; and new text end new text begin (5) the president of the Minnesota Association of County Officers, or a designee thereof. new text end new text begin (b) Each appointing authority must appoint task force members no later than August 1, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The task force must analyze and evaluate: new text end new text begin (1) the need for changing the personal information protections currently available to government officials under law; new text end new text begin (2) the need for changing what government officials qualify for those protections; new text end new text begin (3) options for effectively and efficiently administering current protections as well as any proposed expanded protections; and new text end new text begin (4) other issues the task force considers relevant to protection of the personal information and privacy of Minnesota government officials. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Meetings, administration, and compensation. new text end new text begin (a) The task force shall elect a chair and vice-chair and may elect other officers as necessary. new text end new text begin (b) The chair of the Legislative Commission on Data Practices shall convene the first meeting of the task force no later than August 1, 2026. The Legislative Commission on Data Practices shall provide meeting space and administrative assistance as necessary for the task force to conduct its work. new text end new text begin (c) The task force shall meet at least monthly or upon the call of the chair. The task force shall meet sufficiently enough to accomplish the tasks identified in this section. Meetings of the task force are subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 3.055. new text end new text begin (d) Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 3, governs compensation of the members of the task force. new text end new text begin (e) Members of the task force serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority or until the task force expires. Vacancies shall be filled by the appointing authority consistent with the qualifications of the vacating member required by this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report required. new text end new text begin The task force must issue a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over data practices by January 15, 2027, discussing the task force's conclusions, including any recommended changes to state laws. The report must be prepared and filed consistent with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 3.195. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires January 15, 2027, or the day following the issuance of the report required under subdivision 5, whichever occurs first. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL PRIVACY PROTECTIONS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for the legislative task force on government official privacy protections established in section 3. This appropriation does not cancel, but is available until January 15, 2027, or until the expiration of the task force, whichever occurs first. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin (a) The revisor of statutes shall substitute the term "covered official" for "judicial official" in Minnesota Statutes, sections 13.991, 480.40 to 480.50, and 609.476, as amended by Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 9, sections 6 and 10 to 13, when referring to those individuals whose personal information is protected by those sections. The revisor shall also make grammatical changes related to the changes in terms. new text end new text begin (b) In Minnesota Statutes, the revisor of statutes shall renumber as chapter 10B the personal information protection laws that are currently coded as Minnesota Statutes, sections 480.40 to 480.50, and shall appropriately revise any statutory cross-references consistent with that recoding. new text end